lucene/analysis/common/src/test/org/apache/lucene/analysis/hunspell/forbiddenword.aff
# FORBIDDENWORD flag
# The signed word, and its suffixed forms are all forbidden,
# excepts with root homonyms.
# Useful for forbidding bad suffixed forms or compounds.


FORBIDDENWORD X
COMPOUNDFLAG Y

SFX A Y 1
SFX A 0 s .

SFX s N 1
SFX s 0 os .
