lucene/analysis/common/src/test/org/apache/lucene/analysis/hunspell/forbiddenword.dic
14
foo/S
foo/YX
bar/YS
bars/X
foos/X
kg
Kg/X
KG/X
cm
Cm/X
SIPS/X
Sip/A
iPod/s
iPodos/X
